Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.38.030

Requirement of notice.

An out-of-state trust institution desiring to engage in trust business in Washington state shall provide, or cause its home state regulator to provide, written notice to the director of its intent to engage in trust business in Washington state, accompanied by a written application containing:

(1) Satisfactory evidence of a certificate of authority to engage in trust business in its home state, or equivalent, from its home state regulator;

(2) A copy of the resolution adopted by the board of directors of such out-of-state trust institution authorizing the out-of-state trust institution to engage in trust business in Washington state;

(3) Evidence of compliance with the requirements of the director set forth in RCW 30B.38.020 or a request for waiver of certain requirements of RCW 30B.38.020 satisfactory to the director; and

(4) A filing fee, if any, as prescribed by the director under authority of RCW 30A.04.070.

[ 2019 c 389 s 49; 2014 c 37 s 369.]